South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3016.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 7, Chapter 19, Title 63 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 63-19-815. (A) A child taken into custody pursuant to Section 63-19-810 must be advised prior to questioning: (1) that the child has a right to remain silent; (2) that any statement the child does make can be and may be used against the child; (3) that the child has a right to have a parent, guardian, or custodian present during questioning; and (4) that the child has a right to consult with an attorney and that one will be appointed for the child if the child is not represented and wants representation. (B) No in custody admission or confession resulting from interrogation, or any derivative thereof, may be admitted into evidence unless the confession or admission was made in the presence of the child's parent, guardian, custodian, or attorney. If an attorney is not present, the parent, guardian, or custodian as well as the child must be advised of the child's rights as set forth in subsection (A); however, a parent, guardian, or custodian may not waive any right on behalf of the child. (C) The parent, guardian, custodian, or attorney of a child taken into custody has the right, upon request, to see the child. (D) If the child indicates in any manner and at any stage of questioning pursuant to this section that the child does not wish to be questioned further, the officer shall cease questioning. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----